Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-825
Authority; sue and be sued.

The authority
may sue and be sued in its own name.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 22;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2922;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 22;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1722;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 25.